California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) (1) If the department deems it necessary to issue general rules in order to implement, interpret, or make specific this section or to establish procedures to implement this section, these rules may be issued without complying with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and shall remain in effect for a period of 180 days.

(2) Thereafter, any rules that are necessary to implement, interpret, or make specific this section or that govern departmental procedures shall be adopted in compliance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(3) The adoption, pursuant to paragraph (1), of any emergency regulations that are filed with the Office of Administrative Law within one year of the effective date of this act shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 385, Sec. 2.   Effective September 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.98.

(a) The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Disproportionate share list” means an annual list of disproportionate share hospitals that provide acute inpatient services issued by the department for purposes of this section. 

(2) “Fund” means the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment Fund, created pursuant to Section 14163. 

(3) “Eligible hospital” means a hospital included on a disproportionate share list, which is eligible to receive payment adjustments under this section with respect to a particular state fiscal year.

(4) “Hospital” means a health facility that is licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code to provide acute inpatient hospital services, and includes all components of the facility. 

(5) “Payment adjustment” or “payment adjustment amount” means an amount paid under this section for acute inpatient hospital services provided by a disproportionate share hospital. 

(6) “Payment adjustment year” means the particular state fiscal year with respect to which payments are to be made to eligible hospitals under this section. 

(7) “Payment adjustment program” means the system of Medi-Cal payment adjustments for acute inpatient hospital services established by this section.

(8) “Annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days” means the total number of Medi-Cal acute inpatient hospital days, regardless of dates of service, for which payment was made by or on behalf of the department to a hospital, under present or previous ownership, during the most recent calendar year ending prior to the beginning of a particular payment adjustment year, including all Medi-Cal acute inpatient covered days of care for hospitals which are paid on a different basis than per diem payments. 

(9) “Low-income utilization rate” means a percentage rate determined by the department in accordance with the requirements of Section 1396r-4(b)(3) of Title 42 of the United States
 Code, and included on a disproportionate share list. 

(10) “Low-income number” means a hospital’s low-income utilization rate rounded down to the nearest whole number, and included on a disproportionate share list. 

(11) “1991 Peer Grouping Report” means the final report issued by the department dated May 1991, entitled “Hospital Peer Grouping.”

(12) “Major teaching hospital” means a hospital that meets the definition of a university teaching hospital, major nonuniversity teaching hospital, or large teaching emphasis hospital as set forth on page 51 of the 1991 Peer Grouping Report. 

(13) “Children’s hospital” means a hospital that meets the definition of a children’s hospital—state defined, as set forth on page 53 of the 1991 Peer Grouping Report, or
 which is listed in subdivision (a), or subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive, of Section 16996. 

(14) “Acute psychiatric hospital” means a hospital that meets the definition of an acute psychiatric hospital, a combination psychiatric/alcohol-drug rehabilitation hospital, or a psychiatric health facility, to the extent the facility is licensed to provide acute inpatient hospital service, as set forth on page 52 of the 1991 Peer Grouping Report.

(15) “Alcohol-drug rehabilitation hospital” means a hospital that meets the definition of an alcohol-drug rehabilitation hospital as set forth on page 52 of the 1991 Peer Grouping Report. 

(16) “Emergency services hospital” means a hospital that is a licensed provider of basic emergency services as described in Sections 70411 to 70419, inclusive, of Title 22 of the California Code
 of Regulations, or that is a licensed provider of comprehensive emergency medical services as described in Sections 70451 to 70459, inclusive, of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(17) “Medi-Cal day of acute inpatient hospital service” means any acute inpatient day of service attributable to patients who, for those days, were eligible for medical assistance under the California state plan, including any day of service that is reimbursed on a basis other than per diem payments.

(18) “Total per diem composite amount” means, for each eligible hospital for a particular payment adjustment year, the total of the various per diem payment adjustment amounts to be paid to the hospital for each eligible day as calculated under the applicable provisions of this section.

(19) “Supplemental lump-sum payment
 adjustment” means a lump-sum amount paid under this section for acute inpatient hospital services provided by a disproportionate share hospital.

(20) “Projected total payment adjustment amount” means, for each eligible hospital for a particular payment adjustment year, the amount calculated by the department as the projected maximum total amount the hospital is expected to receive under the payment adjustment program for the particular payment adjustment year (including all per diem payment adjustment amounts and any applicable supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments).

(21) “To align the program with the federal allotment” means to modify the size of the payment adjustment program to be as close as reasonably feasible to, but not to exceed, the estimated or actual maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for the particular federal fiscal year for California under
 Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(22) “Descending pro rata basis” means an allocation methodology under which a pool of funds is distributed to hospitals on a pro rata basis until one of the recipient hospitals reaches its maximum payment limit, after which all remaining amounts in the pool are distributed on a pro rata basis to the recipient hospitals that have not reached their maximum payment limits, until another hospital reaches its maximum payment limit, and which process is repeated until the entire pool of funds has been distributed among the recipient hospitals.

(23) “Secondary supplemental payment adjustment” means a payment adjustment amount, whether paid or payable, to an eligible hospital as a second type of supplemental distribution earned as of June 30, 1996, with respect to the 1995–96 payment adjustment year.

(24) “OBRA 1993 payment limitation” means the hospital-specific limitation on the total annual amount of payment adjustments to each eligible hospital under the payment adjustment program that can be made with federal financial participation under Section 1396r-4(g) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as implemented pursuant to the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(25) “Public hospital” means a hospital that is licensed to a county, a city, a city and county, the State of California, the University of California, a local health care district, a local health authority, or any other political subdivision of the state.

(26) “Nonpublic hospital” means a hospital that satisfies all of the following:

(A) The hospital does not meet the definition of a public hospital as
 described in paragraph (25).

(B) The hospital does not meet the definition of a nonpublic-converted hospital as described in paragraph (27).

(C) The hospital does not meet the definition of a converted hospital as described in paragraph (28).

(27) “Nonpublic-converted hospital” means a hospital that satisfies all of the following, or, if two or more inpatient facilities are licensed by the department under a consolidated license, a hospital as to which any component of the hospital satisfies all of the following:

(A) The hospital does not meet the definition of a public hospital as described in paragraph (25).

(B) The hospital or such component, at any time during the 1994–95 payment
 adjustment year, was a public hospital as described in paragraph (25), whether or not the hospital or such component currently is located at the same site as it was located when it was a public hospital.

(C) The hospital does not meet the definition of a converted hospital as described in paragraph (28).

(28) “Converted hospital” means a hospital that satisfies both of the following:

(A) The hospital does not meet the definition of a public hospital as described in paragraph (25).

(B) The hospital, at any time during the 1999–2000 payment adjustment year, was an eligible hospital meeting the definition of a public hospital as described in paragraph (25), whether or not the hospital currently is located at the same site as it was located when it was a
 public hospital.

(29) “Remained in operation” or “remains in operation” means that, except for closure or other cessation of services caused by natural disasters or other events beyond the hospital’s reasonable control, including labor disputes, the hospital was licensed to provide hospital inpatient services, and continued to provide, or was available to provide, hospital inpatient services to Medi-Cal patients throughout the particular time period in question.

(30) “Maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California” means, with respect to the 1998 federal fiscal year and subsequent federal fiscal years, that amount specified for California under Section 1396r-4(f) of Title 42 of the United State Code for that fiscal year, divided by the federal medical assistance percentage applicable for federal financial participation purposes for Medi-Cal program
 expenditures with respect to that same federal fiscal year.

(31) “Applicable federal fiscal year” means, with respect to the 2000–01 payment adjustment year and subsequent payment adjustment years, the federal fiscal year that commences on October 1 of the particular payment adjustment year.

(32) “Medical assistance increment” means the federal medical assistance percentage applicable for federal financial participation purposes for Medi-Cal program expenditures, expressed as a percentage, less the number one-half, expressed as a percentage.

(b) For each fiscal year commencing with 1991–92, there shall be Medi-Cal payment adjustment amounts paid to hospitals pursuant to this section. The amount of payments made and the eligible hospitals for each payment adjustment year shall be determined in accordance with the
 provisions of this section. The payments are intended to support health care services rendered by disproportionate share hospitals. 

(c) For each fiscal year commencing with 1991–92, the department shall issue a disproportionate share list. The list shall be developed in accordance with subdivisions (e) and (f), and shall serve as a basis for payments under this section for the particular payment adjustment year.

(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided by this section, the payment adjustment amounts under this section shall be distributed as a supplement to, and concurrent with, payments on all billings for Medi-Cal acute inpatient hospital services that are paid through Medi-Cal claims payment systems on or after July 1, 1991. In connection with those billings, the department shall pay payment adjustment amounts in accordance with subdivision (g), (h), (i), or
 (j), as applicable, to any hospital qualifying under subdivision (e). In addition, the department shall pay to each of those hospitals any supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amounts that are payable, and shall adjust payment amounts, in accordance with applicable provisions of this section. The nonfederal share of all payment adjustment amounts shall be funded by amounts from the fund. The department shall obtain federal matching funds for the payment adjustment program through customary Medi-Cal accounting procedures.

(2) As a limitation to paragraph (1), all payment adjustment amounts under this section, which are due with respect to billings paid through Medi-Cal claims payment systems on or after July 1, 1991, shall be suspended until the time federal approval is first obtained for the payment adjustment program as part of the Medi-Cal program. For purposes of this paragraph, federal approval requires both (i) approval by appropriate
 federal agencies of an amendment to the Medi-Cal State Plan, as referred to in subdivision (o), and (ii) confirmation by appropriate federal agencies regarding the availability of federal financial participation for the payment adjustment program at a level of at least 40 percent of the percentage of federal financial participation that is normally applicable for Medi-Cal expenditures for acute inpatient hospital services. At the time federal approval is first obtained, the department shall proceed pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) in connection with the suspended payment adjustment amounts.

(A) Except as provided by subdivision (l), or by any other subdivision of this section, any payment adjustment amounts which were suspended shall, within 60 days, be paid for all those billings paid through Medi-Cal claims payment systems during periods of time, on or after July 1, 1991, for which federal approval is first effective for the
 payment adjustment program.

(B) Payment adjustment amounts shall not be paid in connection with any Medi-Cal billings which were paid through Medi-Cal claims payment systems during any period of time for which federal approval is not effective for the payment adjustment program. 

(3) As a limitation to paragraph (1), the amendments to this section enacted during calendar year 1993 shall not be implemented until the department has obtained any approvals that are necessary under federal law. Until all necessary federal approvals are obtained, the payment adjustment program shall continue as though no amendments had been enacted during calendar year 1993. When all necessary federal approvals have been obtained, the amendments enacted during calendar year 1993, shall be implemented effective as of the earliest effective date permissible under federal law.

(4) As a limitation to paragraph (1), amendments to this section enacted during calendar year 1994 shall not be implemented until the department has obtained any approvals that are necessary under federal law. Until all necessary federal approvals are obtained, the payment adjustment program shall continue as though no amendments had been enacted during calendar year 1994. When all necessary federal approvals have been obtained, the amendments enacted during calendar year 1994 shall be implemented effective as of the earliest effective date permissible under federal law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after the date that federal approval is obtained the payments made prior to that date with respect to the 1994–95 payment adjustment year or subsequent payment adjustment years shall be deemed nonfinal payments for purposes of this section and Section 14163. Any of those amounts paid or payable prior to that date shall then be
 compared to the payments that would have been made pursuant to the program changes as approved by the federal government for all periods of time permissible under federal law, and the difference, if any, shall be paid or recouped by the department, as appropriate.

(5) As a limitation to paragraph (1), amendments to this section enacted during June 1996 shall not be implemented until the department has obtained any approvals that are necessary under federal law. Until all necessary federal approvals are obtained, the payment adjustment program shall continue as though no amendments had been enacted during June 1996. When all necessary federal approvals have been obtained, the amendments enacted during June 1996 shall be implemented effective as of the earliest effective date permissible under federal law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after the date that federal approval is obtained, the payments made prior to that date with
 respect to the 1995–96 payment adjustment year shall be deemed nonfinal payments for purposes of this section and Section 14163. Any of those amounts paid or payable prior to that date shall then be compared to the payments that would have been made pursuant to the program changes as approved by the federal government for all periods of time permissible under federal law, and the difference, if any, shall be paid or recouped by the department, as appropriate.

(6) As a limitation to paragraph (1), any amendment of this section enacted during the period August 1, 1996, to September 30, 1996, inclusive, shall not be implemented until the department has obtained any approvals that are necessary under federal law. Until all necessary federal approvals are obtained, the payment adjustment program shall continue as though no amendments had been enacted during the period August 1, 1996, to September 30, 1996, inclusive. When all necessary federal
 approvals have been obtained, the amendments enacted during the period August 1, 1996, to September 30, 1996, inclusive, shall be implemented effective as of the earliest effective date permissible under federal law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after the date that federal approval is obtained, the payments made prior to that date with respect to the 1996–97 payment adjustment year shall be deemed nonfinal payments for purposes of this section and Section 14163. Any of those amounts paid or payable prior to that date shall then be compared to the payments that would have been made pursuant to the program changes as approved by the federal government for all periods of time permissible under federal law, and the difference, if any, shall be paid or recouped by the department, as appropriate.

(7) As a limitation to paragraph (1), any amendment of this section enacted during the period September 1, 1997, to September 30, 1997,
 inclusive, shall not be implemented until the department has obtained any approvals that are appropriate under federal law. Until appropriate federal approvals are obtained, the payment adjustment program shall continue as though amendments had not been enacted during the period September 1, 1997, to September 30, 1997, inclusive. When appropriate federal approvals have been obtained, the amendments enacted during the period September 1, 1997, to September 30, 1997, inclusive, shall be implemented effective as of the earliest effective date permissible under federal law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after the date that federal approval is obtained, the payments made prior to that date with respect to the 1997–98 payment adjustment year shall be deemed nonfinal payments for purposes of this section and Section 14163. Any of those amounts paid or payable prior to that date shall then be compared to the payments that would have been made pursuant to the program changes as approved by the
 federal government for all periods of time permissible under federal law, and the difference, if any, shall be paid or recouped by the department, as appropriate.

(8) As a limitation to paragraph (1), any amendment of this section enacted during the 1998 calendar year shall not be implemented until the department has obtained any approvals that are appropriate under federal law. Until appropriate federal approvals are obtained, the payment adjustment program shall continue as though amendments had not been enacted during the 1998 calendar year. When appropriate federal approvals have been obtained, the amendments enacted during the 1998 calendar year shall be implemented effective as of the earliest effective date permissible under federal law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after the date that federal approval is obtained, the payments made prior to that date with respect to the particular payment adjustment year shall be
 deemed nonfinal payments for purposes of this section and Section 14163. Any of those amounts paid or payable prior to that date shall then be compared to the payments that would have been made pursuant to the program changes as approved by the federal government for all periods of time permissible under federal law, and the difference, if any, shall be paid or recouped by the department, as appropriate.

(9) As a limitation to paragraph (1), any amendment of this section enacted during the period of June 1, 1999, to June 30, 1999, inclusive, shall not be implemented until the department has obtained any approvals that are appropriate under federal law. Until appropriate federal approvals are obtained, the payment adjustment program shall continue as though amendments had not been enacted during the period of June 1, 1999, to June 30, 1999, inclusive. When appropriate federal approvals have been obtained, the amendments enacted during the period
 of June 1, 1999, to June 30, 1999, inclusive, shall be implemented effective as of the earliest effective date permissible under federal law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after the date that federal approval is obtained, the payments made prior to that date with respect to the particular payment adjustment year shall be deemed nonfinal payments for purposes of this section and Section 14163. Any of those amounts paid or payable prior to that date shall then be compared to the payments that would have been made pursuant to the program changes as approved by the federal government for all periods of time permissible under federal law, and the difference, if any, shall be paid or recouped by the department, as appropriate.

(10) As a limitation to paragraph (1), any amendment of this section enacted during the period of June 1, 2000, to June 30, 2000, inclusive, shall not be implemented until the department has obtained any
 approvals that are appropriate under federal law. Until appropriate federal approvals are obtained, the payment adjustment program shall continue as though amendments had not been enacted during the period of June 1, 2000, to June 30, 2000, inclusive. When appropriate federal approvals have been obtained, the amendments enacted during the period of June 1, 2000, to June 30, 2000, inclusive, shall be implemented effective as of the earliest effective date permissible under federal law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after the date that federal approval is obtained, the payments made prior to that date with respect to the particular payment adjustment year shall be deemed nonfinal payments for purposes of this section and Section 14163. Any of those amounts paid or payable prior to that date shall then be compared to the payments that would have been made pursuant to the program changes as approved by the federal government for all periods of time permissible under federal law, and the
 difference, if any, shall be paid or recouped by the department, as appropriate.

(e) To qualify for payment adjustment amounts under this section, a hospital shall have been included on the disproportionate share list for the particular payment adjustment year. The list shall consist of those hospitals which satisfy both of the following requirements:

(1) The hospital shall meet the federal requirements for disproportionate share status set forth in subsection (d) of Section 1396r-4 of Title 42 of the United States Code. 

(2) Either of the following shall apply:

(A) The hospital’s medicaid inpatient utilization rate, as defined in Section 1396r-4(b)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, shall be at least one standard deviation above the mean
 medicaid inpatient utilization rate for hospitals receiving medicaid payments in the state.

(B) The hospital’s low-income utilization rate shall exceed 25 percent.

(f) (1) For the 1991–92 payment adjustment year, a disproportionate share list shall be issued by the department no later than 65 days after the enactment of this section. For subsequent payment adjustment years, a tentative listing shall be prepared by the department at least 60 days before the beginning of the particular payment adjustment year, and a disproportionate share list shall be issued no later than five days after the beginning of the particular payment adjustment year. All state agencies shall take all necessary steps to supply the most recent data available to the department to meet these deadlines. The Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development shall provide to the
 department quarterly access to the edited and unedited confidential patient discharge data files for all Medi-Cal eligible patients. The department shall maintain the confidentiality of that data to the same extent as is required of the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development. In addition, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development shall provide to the department no later than March 1 of each year, the data specified by the department, as the data existed on the statewide data base file as of February 1 of each year (except that for the 1991–92 payment adjustment year, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development shall provide data as it existed on the statewide data base file as of August 30, 1991), from all of the following:

(A) Hospital annual disclosure reports, filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development pursuant to Section 443.31 or 128735 of the Health and Safety Code, for
 hospital fiscal years which ended during the calendar year ending 13 months prior to the applicable February 1.

(B) Annual reports of hospitals, filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development pursuant to Section 439.2 or 127285 of the Health and Safety Code, for the calendar year ending 13 months prior to the applicable February 1.

(C) Hospital patient discharge data reports, filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 443.31 or 128735 of the Health and Safety Code, for the calendar year ending 13 months prior to the applicable February 1.

(D) Any other materials on file with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(2) The disproportionate share list shall
 show all of the following:

(A) The name and license number of the hospital.

(B) Expressed as a percentage, the hospital’s Medi-Cal utilization rate and low-income utilization rate as referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e). The department shall determine these rates in accordance with paragraph (4).

(C) Based on the hospital’s low-income utilization rate, the hospital’s low-income number.

(3) The department shall determine a hospital’s satisfaction of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) based on the most recent annual data available, as it existed on the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development statewide data base file as of February 1 of each year, and August 30 for the 1991–92 payment adjustment year, whether the data relates to
 operations under present or previous ownership.

(4) To determine a hospital’s Medi-Cal inpatient utilization rate and low-income utilization rate for purposes of disproportionate share lists, the department shall utilize the same methodology, formulae, and data sources as set forth in connection with interim determinations in Attachment 4.19-A of the Medi-Cal State Plan (effective on or about July 1, 1990), and as subsequently amended by Medi-Cal State Plan amendments relating to the payment adjustment program submitted to and approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration, except that the following shall apply:

(A) The calculations shall not be interim, but shall be final for purposes of this section.

(B) To the extent permitted by federal law, the payment adjustment amounts provided to hospitals
 pursuant to this section shall not be included for any purpose in the calculations and determinations made pursuant to this section. 

(C) Any other variation otherwise required by this section or by federal law. 

(D) The data utilized by the department shall relate to the hospital under present and previous ownership. When there has been a change of ownership, a change in the location of the main hospital facility, or a material change in patient admission patterns during the 24 months immediately prior to the payment adjustment year, and the change has resulted in a diminution of access for Medi-Cal inpatients at the hospital, all as determined by the department, the department shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, utilize current data that are reflective of the diminution of access, even if the data are not annual data.

(E) Unless expressly provided otherwise by this section, the hospital’s low-income utilization rate shall be based on the most recent annual data available from annual hospital reports existing on the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development data base file as of February 1 of each year.

(F) (i) If, for the 1994–95 payment adjustment year, some or all of the annual data elements available to the department from hospital reports filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development for purposes of computing hospital low-income utilization rates are different than in prior years due to changes in data reporting requirements of the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development or changes in other state health care programs, the department shall take the necessary steps to obtain from hospitals appropriate data in order to clarify the
 annual data filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development. This shall be done by the department in order to ensure that low-income utilization rates are determined in a manner as equivalent as possible to the approach and methodology used for the 1991–92 payment adjustment year.

(ii) The efforts of the department to obtain and apply data for the purposes described in clause (i) shall include a survey to collect, from one or more hospitals, any data necessary to calculate the low-income utilization rates in accordance with clause (i). The purpose for the survey shall be to clarify the data already included by hospitals in their annual reports submitted to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development. The data requested by the department in the survey may include, among other things, information regarding the manner in which payments made to hospitals under this section were reported by the hospitals to the Office
 of Statewide Health Planning and Development. The data requested may also include information regarding the manner in which hospitals reported figures relating to charity care, bad debts, and amounts received in connection with state or local indigent care programs.

(iii) In connection with any survey conducted under clause (ii), the department may require that hospitals submit responses in accordance with a deadline established by the department, and that the responses be supported by a verification of a hospital representative. Should any hospital not respond on a timely basis in accordance with protocols established by the department, the department shall utilize prior year data, adjusted by the department in its discretion, to calculate the hospital’s low-income utilization rate.

(G) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all payment adjustment amounts, including per diem
 payment adjustment amounts and supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments, paid or payable to a hospital under this section, shall be recorded on an accrual basis of accounting in reports filed by the hospital with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development or the department.

(5) For purposes of payment adjustment amounts under this section, each disproportionate share list shall be considered complete when issued by the department pursuant to paragraph (1). Nothing on a disproportionate share list, once issued by the department, shall be modified for any reason, other than mathematical or typographical errors or omissions on the part of the department or the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development in preparation of the list. 

(6) No Medi-Cal State Plan amendment of the type referred to in paragraph (4) shall be valid if inconsistent with this section. For
 those Medi-Cal State Plan amendments of the type referred to in paragraph (4), to be initially submitted to the federal Health Care Financing Administration on or after the operative date of this paragraph, these amendments shall be provided to representatives of the hospital industry, including, but not limited to, the California Healthcare Association, as soon as possible, but in no event less than 30 days prior to submission of the amendment to the federal Health Care Financing Administration. If, in the public interest, the director determines that exigent circumstances necessitate that the 30-day requirement cannot be met, the director shall immediately in writing advise the Chairperson of the Senate Committee on Health and Human Services and the Assembly Committee on Health of the exigent circumstances and the department’s timetable for providing the amendment to the hospital industry.

(g) For each Medi-Cal day of acute inpatient hospital
 service paid by or on behalf of the department during a payment adjustment year, regardless of dates of service, to a hospital on the applicable disproportionate share list, where that hospital, on the first day of the payment adjustment year, is a major teaching hospital, the hospital shall be paid the sum of all of the following amounts, except as limited by other applicable provisions of this section:

(1) A minimum payment adjustment of three hundred dollars ($300). 

(2) The sum of the following amounts, minus three hundred dollars ($300):

(A) A ninety dollar ($90) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 25 percent to 29 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(B) A seventy
 dollar ($70) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 30 percent to 34 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(C) A fifty dollar ($50) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 35 percent to 44 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(D) A thirty dollar ($30) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 45 percent to 64 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list.

(E) A ten dollar ($10) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 65 percent to 80 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list.

(3) If the sum calculated under paragraph (2) is less than zero, it shall be disregarded for payment purposes.

(h) For each Medi-Cal day of acute inpatient hospital service paid by or on behalf of the department during a payment adjustment year, regardless of dates of service, to a hospital on the applicable disproportionate share list, where that hospital, on the first day of the payment adjustment year, is a children’s hospital, the hospital shall be paid the sum of four hundred fifty dollars ($450), except as limited by other applicable provisions of this section. 

(i) For each Medi-Cal day of acute inpatient hospital service paid by or on behalf of the department during a payment adjustment year, regardless of dates of service, to a hospital on the applicable disproportionate share list, where that hospital, on the first day of the payment adjustment year, is an
 acute psychiatric hospital or an alcohol-drug rehabilitation hospital, the hospital shall be paid the sum of all of the following amounts, except as limited by other applicable provisions of this section:

(1) A minimum payment adjustment of fifty dollars ($50). 

(2) The sum of the following amounts, minus fifty dollars ($50):

(A) A ten dollar ($10) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 25 to 29 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(B) A seven dollar ($7) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 30 to 34 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(C) A five dollar ($5) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 35 to 44 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(D) A two dollar ($2) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 45 to 64 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(E) A one dollar ($1) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 65 to 80 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list.

(3) If the sum calculated under paragraph (2) is less than zero, it shall be disregarded for payment purposes. 

(j) For each Medi-Cal day of acute inpatient hospital service paid by or on behalf of
 the department during a payment adjustment year, regardless of dates of service, to a hospital on the applicable disproportionate share list, where that hospital does not meet the criteria for receiving payments under subdivision (g), (h), or (i) above, the hospital shall be paid the sum of all of the following amounts, except as limited by other applicable provisions of this section:

(1) A minimum payment adjustment of one hundred dollars ($100). 

(2) If the hospital is an emergency services hospital at the time the payment adjustment is paid, a two hundred dollar ($200) payment adjustment. 

(3) The sum of the following amounts minus one hundred dollars ($100), and minus an additional two hundred dollars ($200) if the hospital is an emergency services hospital at the time the payment adjustment is paid:

(A) A forty dollar ($40) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 25 percent to 29 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list.

(B) A thirty-five dollar ($35) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 30 percent to 34 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(C) A thirty dollar ($30) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 35 percent to 44 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(D) A twenty dollar ($20) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 45 percent to 64 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the
 disproportionate share list. 

(E) A fifteen dollar ($15) payment adjustment for each percentage point, from 65 percent to 80 percent, inclusive, of the hospital’s low-income number as shown on the disproportionate share list. 

(4) If the sum calculated under paragraph (3) is less than zero, it shall be disregarded for payment purposes. 
